Utah statutes.
9-6-303.   Annual members -- Fees.

Each patron of the arts or anyone interested in them shall, upon payment of a membership fee determined by the board by rule, and if elected by the board, receive a certificate of membership for one year and become an annual member.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

